Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-5507
Act; applicability; effect.

(1) The Agricultural Suppliers Lease Protection Act shall not apply to any valid lease entered into prior to July 20, 2002, or any renewal or extension thereof on the same terms and conditions, but the provisions of the act shall apply to and govern any renewal or extension of such lease on any different terms or conditions or any material modifications of any such lease effected on or after July 20, 2002.

(2) Any party having a right of first refusal or right of renewal under the Agricultural Suppliers Lease Protection Act shall be barred from making any subsequent claim to possession or title to the railroad land if it fails to bring an action asserting that it has been denied its right of first refusal or right of renewal in violation of the act within six months after the date of a lease or after the expiration of a lease or sale by the railroad to a party other than the agricultural tenant.

Laws 2002, LB 435, § 7.